Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 7 Teachers and Employees

Cross references. —

As to powers of boards of trustees of school districts with respect to employing and discharging teachers and others, see §

21-3-111

.

As to status of students of teaching assigned to field experience, see §

21-21-104

.

As to social security for school officers and employees, see §

9-3-301

et seq.

As to retirement of state employees and teachers, see §

9-3-401

et seq.

As to duties of teachers with respect to fire drills, see §

35-9-505

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

For Article, “Teacher Tenure Reform in Wyoming: Bad Teachers Left Behind”, see15 Wyo. L. Rev. 45 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

See 68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 134 to 237.

Services included in computing period of service for purpose of teacher's seniority, 2 ALR2d 1033.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to school teachers, 18 ALR2d 268.

Wearing of religious garb by public school teachers, 60 ALR2d 300.

Bargainable or negotiable issues in state public employment labor relations, 84 ALR3d 242.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances or regulations requiring competency tests of school teachers, 64 ALR4th 642.

Validity, construction and effect of municipal residency requirements for teachers, principals and other school employees, 75 ALR4th 272.

Racial discrimination in the hiring, retention, and assignment of teachers — federal cases, 3 ALR Fed 325.

Application of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 USC § 1681 et seq.) to sex discrimination in educational employment, 54 ALR Fed 522.

Right of action under Title IX of Education Amendments Act of 1972 (20 USC § 1681 et seq.) against school or school district for sexual harassment of student by student's peer, 141 ALR Fed 407.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — private employment cases 150 ALR Fed 1.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 191 to 355.